Connecticut, session 2026, SB00190.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 20-200 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 20-198, the
Department of Public Health may issue a license by endorsement to any
veterinarian of good professional character who is currently licensed
and practicing in some other state or territory, having requirements for
admission determined by the department to be at least equal to the
requirements of this state, upon the payment of a fee of five hundred
sixty-five dollars to said department. Notwithstanding the provisions of
section 20-198, the department may, upon payment of a fee of five
hundred sixty-five dollars, issue a license without examination to a
currently practicing, competent veterinarian in another state or territory
who [(1)] (A) holds a current valid license in good professional standing
issued after examination by another state or territory that maintains
licensing standards which, except for examination, are commensurate
with this state's standards, and [(2)] (B) has worked continuously as a
LCO 1 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 190
licensed veterinarian in an academic or clinical setting in another state
or territory for a period of not less than five years immediately
preceding the application for licensure without examination. No license
shall be issued under this section to any applicant against whom
professional disciplinary action is pending or who is the subject of an
unresolved complaint. The department shall inform the board annually
of the number of applications it receives for licensure under this section.
[(b)] (2) The Department of Public Health may issue a temporary
permit under this subsection to an applicant for licensure without
examination upon receipt of a completed application form,
accompanied by the fee for licensure without examination, a copy of a
current license from another state of the United States, the District of
Columbia or a commonwealth or territory subject to the laws of the
United States, and a notarized affidavit attesting that the license is valid
and belongs to the person requesting notarization. Such temporary
permit shall be valid for a period not to exceed one hundred twenty
calendar days and shall not be renewable. The department shall not
issue a temporary permit under this section to any applicant against
whom professional disciplinary action is pending, or who is the subject
of an unresolved complaint.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 20-198, the Department
of Public Health may issue a temporary permit to an applicant who (1)
is a graduate from a school located outside of the United States, its
territories or Canada with a degree of doctor of veterinary medicine, or
its equivalent, from a program acceptable to the American Veterinary
Medical Association as required to receive certification by the
Educational Commission for Foreign Veterinary Graduates, (2) is
working toward receiving certification from the Educational
Commission for Foreign Veterinary Graduates or Program for the
Assessment of Veterinary Education Equivalence, and (3) has passed the
written, oral and practical examinations required under section 20-199.
Such temporary permit shall authorize the holder to practice veterinary
medicine only under the direct supervision of a veterinarian who has
been licensed under chapter 384 for not less than four years. Such
LCO 2 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 190
temporary permit shall be valid for a period not to exceed two years
after the date of issuance, except such temporary permit shall be
renewable once for a period of two years if the applicant fails to receive
certification from the Educational Commission for Foreign Veterinary
Graduates or Program for the Assessment of Veterinary Education
Equivalence within the first two-year period. No fee shall be required
for the issuance or renewal of a temporary permit under this section. As
used in this subsection, "direct supervision" means the licensed
veterinarian is present in the office where the temporary permit holder
is performing such holder's duties and immediately available to furnish
assistance and direction to such holder throughout the performance of
such duties.
Sec. 2. Subsection (c) of section 20-197 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(c) [A] (1) Except as provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection, a
veterinarian-client-patient relationship may not be established solely
through veterinary telemedicine. After a veterinarian-client-patient
relationship has been established, such relationship may be maintained
through veterinary telemedicine in between medically necessary
examinations of the animal by the veterinarian or timely medical visits
by the veterinarian to the location where the animal is kept. If there is
no veterinarian-client-patient relationship, a veterinarian may only
provide general advice using electronic means and shall not provide any
specific advice regarding the animal, including, but not limited to, any
diagnosis or recommended medical care or treatment of the animal. As
used in this subsection, "veterinary telemedicine" means the exchange
of medical information regarding the status of an animal's health or the
delivery of a medical diagnosis, care or treatment of an animal through
electronic means, including, but not limited to, telephone, video, mobile
applications or an Internet web site-based platform.
(2) A veterinarian-client-patient relationship may be established
through veterinary telemedicine only when (A) a veterinarian
LCO 3 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 190
determines that the animal is in urgent need of medical care or treatment
that will take a maximum of fourteen days for the veterinarian to
administer to the animal, and (B) the client schedules an in-person
examination of the animal by the veterinarian to occur not later than
fourteen days after the initial veterinary telemedicine visit. The
veterinarian-client-patient relationship established under this
subdivision shall not continue after such fourteen-day period ends
unless the veterinarian examines the animal in person within such
fourteen-day period.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 20-200
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 20-197(c)
PH Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 4 of 4